South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4161.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 7, Title 2 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 2-7-36.  For purposes of the laws of this State, life begins at the moment of conception. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----